California statutes. Education Code
The addition of the college named in Section 92200 to this section is not intended to mark a change from the funding authorizations made by Section 67354, as contained in the Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of 1986, or Section 67334, as contained in the Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of 1988, but is intended to state more clearly what was intended by the Legislature in those sections as well.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 10.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fiscal Provisions [67358.5. - 67359.5.]

67358.5.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of nine hundred million dollars ($900,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 67359.3, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds shall, when sold, be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the committee at any different times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67358.6.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law shall apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter. For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, each state agency administering an appropriation of the bond fund is designated as the “board” for projects funded by those appropriations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67358.7.

The committee shall authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter only to the extent necessary to fund the apportionments that are expressly authorized by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Pursuant to that legislative direction, the committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the actions specified in Section 67358.4 and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67358.8.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year, and it is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67358.9.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 67359, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67359.

(a) For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, together with interest at the rate paid on moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from money received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(b) No funds shall be expended pursuant to this chapter for the acquisition and development of new campuses that would increase the number of campuses designated in Section 67358.1.

(c) Any request forwarded to the Legislature and the Department of Finance for funds from this bond issue for expenditure for the purposes described in Section 67358.4 by the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges shall be accompanied by the five-year capital outlay plan of the particular university or college and shall include a schedule that prioritizes the seismic retrofitting needed to significantly reduce, by the 2000-01 fiscal year, in the judgment of the particular university or college, seismic hazards in buildings identified as high priority by the university or college.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67359.1.

All money deposited in the fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67359.2.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board for a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, and may execute those documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. The loan shall be deposited in the fund for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The amount of the loan shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67359.3.

Any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded by the issuance and sale or exchange of refunding bonds in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The approval by the electors of this state of the issuance and sale of bonds under this chapter includes approval of the issuance and sale or exchange of any bonds issued to refund either those bonds or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67359.4.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or the State General Obligation Bond Law set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and the investment earnings on these proceeds, and the Treasurer shall be authorized to use or direct the use of these proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or to take any other action with respect to the investment and use of bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law so as to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67359.5.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.9. Bond Fund Transfers [67359.20. - 67359.20.]

67359.20.

Any funds from the 1988 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund, the June 1990 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund, and the 1992 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund, not to exceed a combined total of seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000), are hereby appropriated to the Director of Finance for allocation to the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges to meet the timely allocation of matching grants to repair, replace, reconstruct, renovate, or retrofit on-campus buildings or facilities, including utilities, and streets and roads that were damaged in the Northridge earthquake of January 17, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 34.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Student Athletes [67360. - 67365.]

67360.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no person shall give, offer, promise, or attempt to give any money or other thing of value to any particular student athlete or member of the immediate family of the student athlete for either of the following purposes:

(1) To induce, encourage, or reward the student athlete’s application, enrollment, or attendance, at a public or private institution of postsecondary education in order to have the athlete participate in intercollegiate sporting events, contests, exhibitions, or programs at that institution.

(2) To induce, encourage, or reward the student athlete’s participation in an intercollegiate sporting event, contest, exhibition, or program.

No person shall aid and abet any act described in this subdivision.

(b) This section does not apply to any public or private institution of postsecondary education or to any officer or employee of that institution when the institution, officer, or employee is acting in accordance with an official written policy of that institution which is in compliance with the bylaws of the National Collegiate Athletic Association; or to any intercollegiate athletic awards approved or administered by the student athlete’s institution; or to any other student of that institution; or to any member of the immediate family of the student athlete.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Immediate family” means the student athlete’s spouse, child, parent, stepparent, grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, parent-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, nephew, niece, aunt, uncle, or first cousin, or the spouse of any of those persons, or guardian of any of those persons.

(2) “Student athlete” means a student at a public or private institution of postsecondary education who engages in, is eligible to engage, or may be eligible to engage, in, any intercollegiate sporting event, contest, exhibition, or program, or an individual who has applied, is eligible to apply, or may be eligible to apply in the future to a public or private institution of postsecondary education.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who engages in conduct knowing or having reason to know that such conduct is in violation of subdivision (a) shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or three times the amount given, offered, or promised to the student athlete or immediate family member of the athlete, whichever is greater. The district attorney of any county in which a violation occurs shall enforce this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 902, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

67361.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no student athlete or member of his or her immediate family, as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 67360, shall solicit or accept any money or other thing of value as an inducement, encouragement, or reward, the giving of which is in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 67360.

No person shall aid and abet any act described in this subdivision.

(b) This section does not apply to any student athlete who receives any money or other thing of value from a public or private institution or officers or employees of that institution, offered in accordance with an official written policy of that institution, which is in compliance with the bylaws of the National Collegiate Athletic Association; or from any other student of that institution; or from any member of the immediate family of the student athlete; nor shall this section apply to any student athlete who receives any intercollegiate athletic award approved or administered by that institution.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who engages in conduct knowing or having reason to know that such conduct is in violation of subdivision (a) shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or an amount equal to the amount accepted by the student athlete or immediate family member, whichever is greater. The district attorney of any county in which a violation occurs shall enforce this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 902, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

67362.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 78223 or any other provision of law, no student athlete enrolled at any campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges may participate as a member of any intercollegiate athletic team, or as a participant in any intercollegiate athletic event, except in a manner available to the general public, if he or she, at any time after his or her enrollment as a college or university student, is prosecuted as an adult and is convicted of a violation of Section 187, 209, 210, 211, 220, 243.8, 245, 261, 262, 264.1, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 289,
 or 459 of, or former Section 288a of, or is convicted of attempted murder pursuant to
 subdivision (a) of Section 664 of, the Penal Code.

(b) An institution to which this section applies may rely upon the declaration of a student athlete to determine his or her eligibility for participation in intercollegiate athletics with respect to the requirements of this section. Any declaration obtained from a student athlete pursuant to this subdivision shall contain a notice advising the student that he or she may be subject to disciplinary action, including, but not limited to, suspension, dismissal, or expulsion, if the student knowingly provides false information in the declaration. An institution to which this section applies may, at the discretion of its appropriate administrators, seek independent confirmation of the truth of any and all of the statements of a student athlete taken pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) A student convicted of a violation of any of the Penal Code sections listed in subdivision (a) is eligible to participate as a member of an intercollegiate athletic team after he or she successfully completes the entire term of his or her probation or successfully completes his or her assigned prison term and parole period, if any.

(d) A student who knowingly provides a false declaration pursuant to subdivision (b) may be subject to disciplinary action under Section 66017 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 14.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

67365.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Athletic program” means any intercollegiate athletic program from a California postsecondary educational institution that solicits student athletes to apply, enroll, or attend the postsecondary educational institution in order to have the student athlete participate in intercollegiate sporting events, contests, exhibitions, or programs at that institution.

(2) “Student athlete” means an individual who attends an elementary, junior high, high school, or postsecondary educational institution, and who participates in any interscholastic athletic program in California, including an individual who receives scholarship funds for his or her athletic participation and an individual who does not receive scholarship funds for his or her athletic participation.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2012, a California postsecondary educational institution that offers athletic scholarships
 to student athletes shall provide all of the following information on its Internet Web site:

(1) All of the following athletic scholarship information:

(A) The most recent cost of attendance expenses as published by the postsecondary educational institution’s financial aid offices for the academic year and for the summer year.

(B) The sum of expenses identified in subparagraph (A) that are prohibited from inclusion in a full grant-in-aid athletic scholarship pursuant to the National Collegiate Athletic Association’s (NCAA) rules and regulations.

(C) The policy of the postsecondary educational institution’s athletic program
 as to whether student athletes will receive athletic scholarships for summer school, and, if so, whether these scholarships are proportional to athletic scholarships received during the regular academic school year.

(D) The average monthly full grant-in-aid athletic scholarship payment received by student athletes who live on-campus and off-campus, respectively, during the regular academic year and summer school session.

(E) The following information relating to NCAA scholarship rules: “Pursuant to NCAA rules, a verbal commitment is not binding on either the student athlete or the institution. The National Letter of Intent is a binding agreement between a prospective student athlete and an institution in which the institution agrees to provide a prospective student athlete who is
 admitted to the institution and is eligible for financial aid under NCAA rules athletics aid for one academic year in exchange for the prospective student athlete’s agreement to attend the institution for one academic year. The National Letter of Intent must be accompanied by an institutional financial aid agreement. If the prospective student athlete signs the National Letter of Intent but does not enroll at that institution for a full academic year, he or she may be subject to specific penalties, including loss of a season of eligibility and a mandatory residence requirement.”

(2) All of the following athletic scholarship renewal information:

(A) The NCAA’s policy on scholarship duration.

(B) The policy of the
 postsecondary educational institution’s athletic program concerning the renewal or nonrenewal of an athletic scholarship, including circumstances in which a student athlete in good standing suffers a temporary or permanent sports-related injury, there is a coaching change, or a student athlete’s athletic performance is deemed to be below expectations.

(3) All of the following athletically related medical expenses information:

(A) The NCAA’s policy on whether athletic programs are mandated to pay for athletically related medical expenses.

(B) The policy of the postsecondary educational institution’s athletic program on whether it will pay for student athletes’ athletically related medical expenses, including deductibles, copayments,
 coinsurance, and whether the program will pay for athletically related medical expenses that exceed any maximum insurance coverage limits.

(C) The policy of the institution’s athletic program concerning who is required to pay for any required athletically related insurance premiums for student athletes who do not have such insurance.

(D) The duration of time the postsecondary educational institution’s athletic program continues to pay for athletically related medical expenses after a student athlete’s athletic eligibility expires.

(E) Whether or not an athletic program’s medical policy covers expenses associated with attaining a second medical opinion for an athletically related injury from a medical physician who
 is not associated with the athletic program, and whether the athletic program provides coverage for services received
 from such a physician.

(4) All of the following athletic release information:

(A) The NCAA policy on whether an athletic program may refuse to grant an athletic release to a student athlete who wishes to transfer to another postsecondary educational institution.

(B) The policy of the postsecondary educational institution’s athletic program concerning whether it may use any power to refuse to grant an athletic release for a student athlete who wishes to transfer to another postsecondary educational institution.

(c) Commencing January 1, 2012, a California postsecondary educational institution that provides, by any delivery
 method, written material regarding its athletic program to a student athlete shall include a direct link to the institution’s Internet Web site, where the student athlete shall be able to access all of the information regarding the institution’s athletic scholarship program as described in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 16, Sec. 1.   (AB 1743)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15.5. Student Safety [67380. - 67386.]

67380.

(a) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (6), the governing board of each community college district, the Trustees of the California State University, the Board of Directors of the college named in Section 92200, the Regents of the University of California, and the governing board of any postsecondary educational institution receiving public funds for student financial assistance shall do all of the following:

(1) Require the appropriate officials at each campus within their respective jurisdictions to compile records of both of the following:

(A) All occurrences reported to campus police, campus security personnel, or campus safety authorities of, and arrests for, crimes that are
 committed on campus and that involve violence, hate violence, theft, destruction of property, illegal drugs, or alcohol intoxication.

(B) All occurrences of noncriminal acts of hate violence reported to, and for which a written report is prepared by, designated campus authorities.

(2) Require any written record of a noncriminal act of hate violence to include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) A description of the act of hate violence.

(B) Victim characteristics.

(C) Offender characteristics, if known.

(3) (A) Make the information concerning the crimes compiled pursuant to subparagraph (A) of
 paragraph (1) available within two business days following the request of any student or employee of, or applicant for admission to, any campus within their respective jurisdictions, or to the media, unless the information is the type of information exempt from disclosure pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, in which case the information is not required to be disclosed. Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the name or any other personally identifying information of a victim of any crime defined by Section 243.4, 261, 262, 264, 264.1, 273a, 273d, 273.5, 286, 287, 288, 289, 422.6, 422.7, or 422.75 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code shall not be disclosed without the permission of the victim, or the victim’s parent or guardian if the victim is a minor.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), the campus police, campus security personnel, and campus safety authorities described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall be included within the meaning of “state or local police agency” and “state and local law enforcement agency,” as those terms are used in Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(4) Require the appropriate officials at each campus within their respective jurisdictions to prepare, prominently post, and copy for distribution on request, a campus safety plan that sets forth all of the following: the availability and location of security personnel, methods for summoning assistance of security personnel, any special safeguards that have been established for particular facilities or activities, any actions taken in the preceding 18 months to increase safety, and
 any changes in safety precautions expected to be made during the next 24 months. For purposes of this section, posting and distribution may be accomplished by including relevant safety information in a student handbook or brochure that is made generally available to students.

(5) Require the appropriate officials at each campus within their respective jurisdictions to report information compiled pursuant to paragraph (1) relating to hate violence to the governing board, trustees, board of directors, or regents, as the case may be. The governing board, trustees, board of directors, or regents, as the case may be, shall, upon collection of that information from all of the campuses within their jurisdiction, make a report containing a compilation of that information available to the general public on the internet website of each respective institution. It is the intent of the Legislature that the governing board of each community college district,
 the Trustees of the California State University, the Board of Directors of the college named in Section 92200, the Regents of the University of California, and the governing board of any postsecondary educational institution receiving public funds for student financial assistance establish guidelines for identifying and reporting occurrences of hate violence. It is the intent of the Legislature that the guidelines established by these institutions of higher education be as consistent with each other as possible. These guidelines shall be developed in consultation with the Civil Rights Department and the California Association of Human Relations Organizations.

(6) (A) Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, require any report made by a victim or an employee pursuant to Section 67383 of a Part 1 violent crime, sexual assault, or
 hate crime, as described in Section 422.55 of the Penal Code, received by a campus security authority and made by the victim for purposes of notifying the institution or law enforcement, to be immediately, or as soon as practicably possible, disclosed to the local law enforcement agency with which the institution has a written agreement pursuant to Section 67381 without identifying the victim, unless the victim consents to being identified after the victim has been informed of the victim’s right to have the victim’s personally identifying information withheld. If the victim does not consent to being identified, the alleged assailant shall not be identified in the information disclosed to the local law enforcement agency, unless the institution determines both of the following, in which case the institution shall disclose the identity of the alleged assailant to the local law enforcement agency and shall immediately inform the victim of that disclosure:

(i) The alleged assailant represents a serious or ongoing threat to the safety of students, employees, or the institution.

(ii) The immediate assistance of the local law enforcement agency is necessary to contact or detain the assailant.

(B) The requirements of this paragraph shall not constitute a waiver of, or exception to, any law providing for the confidentiality of information.

(C) This paragraph applies only as a condition for participation in the Cal Grant Program established pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42.

(b) Any person who is refused information required to be made available pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may maintain a civil action for damages against any
 institution that refuses to provide the information, and the court shall award that person an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) if the court finds that the institution refused to provide the information.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Hate violence” means any act of physical intimidation or physical harassment, physical force or physical violence, or the threat of physical force or physical violence, that is directed against any person or group of persons, or the property of any person or group of persons because of the ethnicity, race, national origin, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, or political or religious beliefs of that person or group.

(2) “Part 1 violent crime” means willful homicide, forcible rape, robbery, or aggravated assault, as
 defined in the Uniform Crime Reporting Handbook of the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(3) “Sexual assault” includes, but is not limited to, rape, forced sodomy, forced oral copulation, rape by a foreign object, sexual battery, or the threat of any of these.

(d) This section does not apply to the governing board of a private postsecondary educational institution receiving funds for student financial assistance with a full-time enrollment of less than 1,000 students.

(e) This section shall apply to a campus of one of the public postsecondary educational systems identified in subdivision (a) only if that campus has a full-time equivalent enrollment of more than 1,000 students.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, this section shall
 not apply to the California Community Colleges unless and until the Legislature makes funds available to the California Community Colleges for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 48, Sec. 10) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 11.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

67381.

(a) The Legislature reaffirms that campus law enforcement agencies have the primary authority for providing police or security services, including the investigation of criminal activity, to their campuses.

(b) The Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, and the governing board of independent postsecondary institutions, as defined, shall adopt rules requiring each of their respective campuses to enter into written agreements with local law enforcement agencies that clarify operational responsibilities for investigations of Part 1 violent crimes, sexual assaults, and hate crimes occurring on each campus.

(c) Local law enforcement agencies shall enter into written agreements with campus law enforcement agencies if there are college or university campuses of the governing entities specified in subdivision (b) located in the jurisdictions of the local law enforcement agencies.

(d) Each written agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall designate which law enforcement agency shall have operational responsibility for the investigation of each Part 1 violent crime, sexual assault, and hate crime, and delineate the specific geographical boundaries of each agency’s operational responsibility, including maps as necessary.

(e) A written agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be reviewed, updated if necessary, and made available for public viewing by July 1, 2016, and every five years thereafter.

(f) Each agency shall be responsible for its own costs of investigation unless otherwise specified in a written agreement.

(g) Nothing in this section shall affect existing written agreements between campus law enforcement agencies and local law enforcement agencies that otherwise meet the standards contained in subdivision (d) or any existing mutual aid procedures established pursuant to state or federal law.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of campus law enforcement agencies to provide police services to their campuses.

(i) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Local law enforcement agencies” means city or county
 law enforcement agencies with operational responsibilities for police services in the community in which a campus is located.

(2) “Part 1 violent crimes” means willful homicide, forcible rape, robbery, and aggravated assault, as defined in the Uniform Crime Reporting Handbook of the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(3) “Hate crime” means any offense described in Section 422.55 of the Penal Code.

(4) “Sexual assault” includes, but is not limited to, rape, forced sodomy, forced oral copulation, rape by a foreign object, sexual battery, or threat of any of these.

(5) “Independent postsecondary institutions” means institutions operating pursuant to Section 830.6 of the Penal Code or pursuant to a memorandum of understanding as described in subdivision (b)
 of Section 830.7 of the Penal Code.

(j) This section shall be known and may be cited as the Kristin Smart Campus Safety Act of 1998.

(k) It is the intent of the Legislature by enacting this section to provide the public with clear information regarding the operational responsibilities for the investigation of crimes occurring on university and college campuses by setting minimum standards for written agreements to be entered into by campus law enforcement agencies and local law enforcement agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 701, Sec. 1.   (AB 913)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

67381.1.

(a) The Legislature reaffirms that campus law enforcement agencies have the primary authority for providing police or security services, including the investigation of criminal activity, to their campuses.

(b) The governing board of each community college district shall adopt rules requiring each of their respective campuses to enter into written agreements with local law enforcement agencies that clarify operational responsibilities for investigations of Part 1 violent crimes occurring on each campus.

(c) Local law enforcement agencies shall enter into written agreements with community college campus law enforcement agencies if there are
 community college campuses located in the jurisdictions of the local law enforcement agencies.

(d) Each written agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall designate which law enforcement agency shall have operational responsibility for the investigation of each Part 1 violent crime and delineate the specific geographical boundaries of each agency’s operational responsibility, including maps as necessary.

(e) Written agreements regarding community college law enforcement agencies entered into pursuant to this section or pursuant to Section 67381 as that section read before January 1, 2016, shall be available for public viewing.

(f) Each agency shall be responsible for its own costs of investigation unless otherwise specified in a written agreement.

(g) Nothing in this section shall affect existing written agreements between community college campus law enforcement agencies and local law enforcement agencies that otherwise meet the standards contained in subdivision (d) or any existing mutual aid procedures established pursuant to state or federal law.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of community college campus law enforcement agencies to provide police services to their campuses.

(i) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Local law enforcement agencies” means city or county law enforcement agencies with operational responsibilities for police services in the community in which a campus is located.

(2) “Part
 1 violent crimes” means willful homicide, forcible rape, robbery, and aggravated assault, as defined in the Uniform Crime Reporting Handbook of the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature by enacting this section to provide the public with clear information regarding the operational responsibilities for the investigation of crimes occurring on community college campuses by setting minimum standards for written agreements to be entered into by community college campus law enforcement agencies and local law enforcement agencies.

(k) (1) Upon the governing board of a community college district adopting a rule requiring each of its campuses to update an agreement entered into pursuant to this section or pursuant to Section 67381 as that section read before January 1, 2016, the governing board of the community college district
 shall be treated as a governing entity specified in subdivision (b) of Section 67381 and the community college district and its campuses shall be subject to the requirements of Section 67381 instead of this section.

(2) The Legislature encourages the governing board of each community college district to adopt a rule requiring each of its respective campuses to update these agreements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 701, Sec. 2.   (AB 913)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

67382.

(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2004, and every three years thereafter, the State Auditor shall report the results of an audit of a sample of not less than six institutions of postsecondary education in California that receive federal student aid. The audit shall do both of the following:

(A) Evaluate the accuracy of the institutions’ statistics and the procedures used by the institutions to identify, gather, and track data for publishing, disseminating, and reporting accurate crime statistics in compliance with the requirements of the Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Campus Crime Statistics Act (20 U.S.C.
 Sec. 1092(f)(1) and (5)).

(B) Evaluate the institutions’ compliance with state law governing crime reporting and the development and implementation of policies and procedures pursuant to this chapter.

(2) The results of the annual audits described in paragraph (1) shall be submitted to the respective chairs of the Assembly
 Committee on Higher Education and the Senate Committee on Education.
